Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 27. Marine Products Board.

§ 3.2-2700.
Marine Products Board; composition and appointment of members.

The Marine Products Board is established within the Department.

The Marine Products Board shall consist of 11 members appointed by the Governor from among those persons who earn their livelihood from the seafood industry. One member of the Marine Products Board shall be involved in the Virginia menhaden fishery.

History.

1979, c. 274, §§ 28.1-230, 28.1-231, 28.1-237; 1980, c. 712; 1984, cc. 265, 750; 1985, c. 448; 1992, c. 836, § 3.1-684.59; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2701.
Marine Products Board membership terms.

The terms for appointments to the Marine Products Board shall be for four years. No member shall be eligible for appointment to more than two consecutive terms. Appointments to fill vacancies, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms and made in the same manner as the original appointments.

History.

1979, c. 274, §§ 28.1-230, 28.1-231, 28.1-237; 1980, c. 712; 1984, cc. 265, 750; 1985, c. 448; 1992, c. 836, § 3.1-684.59; 2008, c. 860; 2022, cc. 576, 577.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 576 and 577 are identical, and substituted “four” for “three” in the first sentence.

§ 3.2-2702.
Marine Products Board officers and compensation.

The Marine Products Board shall elect one of its members as chairman, whose term shall be three years or until his successor is elected, and such other officers as deemed appropriate.

The Marine Products Board may appoint an executive secretary and employees as may be necessary at salaries to be fixed by the Marine Products Board, subject to the provisions of Chapter 29 (§

2.2-2900

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

History.

1979, c. 274, §§ 28.1-230, 28.1-231, 28.1-237; 1980, c. 712; 1984, cc. 265, 750; 1985, c. 448; 1992, c. 836, § 3.1-684.59; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2703.
Compensation; expenses; principal office; place of meetings.

The members of the Marine Products Board shall serve without compensation, but shall be eligible for reimbursement for actual expenses incurred in attending meetings of the Marine Products Board.

The Marine Products Board’s office shall be located in Tidewater Virginia, and meetings shall be held in seafood-producing areas of the Commonwealth.

History.

1979, c. 274, § 28.1-232; 1992, c. 836, § 3.1-684.60; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2704.
Powers and duties of the Marine Products Board.

The Marine Products Board shall: (i) plan and conduct marketing, educational, and promotional campaigns and programs for Virginia marine products; (ii) carry on research and testing programs; and (iii) conduct activities relating to the catching, processing, conservation, and marketing of Virginia marine products.

The Marine Products Board may investigate, study, and formulate recommendations regarding regulation, conservation, and management of marine resources of the Commonwealth.

The Marine Products Board may make contracts and expend money from the Virginia Marine Products Fund necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The contracts, debts, and liabilities of the Marine Products Board shall not be an obligation of the Commonwealth, but shall be met utilizing the sums paid into the Virginia Marine Products Fund.

The Marine Products Board may cooperate with other state, regional, and national seafood organizations in research, advertising, publicity, education, and other means of promoting the sale and use of seafood, and may expend moneys of the Virginia Marine Products Fund for such purposes.

History.

1979, c. 274, §§ 28.1-234 to 28.1-236; 1992, c. 836, §§ 3.1-684.61, 3.1-684.62, 3.1-684.64; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-2705.
Virginia Marine Products Fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Virginia Marine Products Fund, hereinafter referred to as “the Fund.” The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. All moneys collected and allocated from marine fisheries license fees required under Subtitle II (§

28.2-200

et seq.) of Title 28.2 shall be paid into the state treasury and credited to the Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund.

Moneys in the Fund shall be administered by the Marine Products Board and used exclusively for the administration of this chapter, including payment for personal services and expenses of employees and agents of the Marine Products Board, rent, services, materials and supplies.

Expenditures and disbursements from the Fund shall be made by the Marine Products Board on warrants issued by the Comptroller upon written request signed by the duly authorized officer of the Marine Products Board.

The Auditor of Public Accounts shall audit all the accounts of the Marine Products Board as provided in § 30-133.

History.

1979, c. 274, §§ 28.1-233, 28.1-238, 28.1-239; 1986, c. 344; 1992, c. 836, § 3.1-684.63; 2008, c. 860.